Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-61] Fees. The commission shall
promulgate a schedule of application and permit fees. The fees shall be used
to defray the administrative costs of the permit systems established under this
chapter. A public agency shall not be subject to the payment of any fees. [L
1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next